Utah statutes.
26-23-5.   Unlawful acts concerning certificates, records, and reports --
Unlawful transportation or acceptance of dead human body.
It is unlawful for any person, association, or corporation and the officers of
any of them:
(1)  to willfully and knowingly make any false statement in a certificate,
record, or report required to be filed with the department, or in an
application for a certified copy of a vital record, or to willfully and
knowingly supply false information intending that the information be used in
the preparation of any  report, record, or certificate, or an amendment to any
of these;
(2)  to make, counterfeit, alter, amend, or mutilate any certificate, record,
or report required to be filed under this code or a certified copy of the
certificate, record, or report without lawful authority and with the intent to
deceive;
(3)  to willfully and knowingly obtain, possess, use, sell, furnish, or
attempt to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish to another, for any purpose
of deception, any certificate, record, report, or certified copy of any of
them, including any that are counterfeited, altered, amended, or mutilated;
(4)  without lawful authority, to possess any certificate, record, or report,
required by the department or a copy or certified copy of the certificate,
record, or report, knowing it to have been stolen or otherwise unlawfully
obtained; or
(5)  to willfully and knowingly transport or accept for transportation,
interment, or other disposition a dead human body without a permit required by
law.
